Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 6. Duration, Revocation, Transfer and Value of Certificates, etc.; Penalties.

§ 5.1-113.
Duration of certificates, registrations, etc.; suspension, revocation, or amendment; penalties.

Certificates, permits, registrations, and licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be effective from the dates specified therein and shall remain in effect until terminated as herein provided. The Commission may at any time, by its order duly entered after hearing held after notice to the holder of any such certificate, permit, registration, or license and an opportunity to such holder to be heard at which it shall be proved that such holder has willfully made any misrepresentation of a material fact in obtaining such certificate, permit, registration, or license, or has willfully violated or refused to observe the laws of this Commonwealth touching such certificate, permit, registration, or license, or any of the terms of his certificate, permit, registration, or license, or any of the Commission’s proper orders, rules, or regulations, impose a penalty not exceeding $1,000, which may be collected by the process of the Commission as provided by law; or the Commission may suspend, revoke, alter, or amend any such certificate, permit, registration, or license for any of the causes set forth above. But no such certificate, permit, registration, or license shall be revoked, altered, or amended (except upon application of the holder thereof) unless the holder thereof shall willfully fail to comply, within a reasonable time to be fixed by the Commission, with the lawful order of the Commission or with the lawful rule or regulation of the Commission, or with the term, condition, or limitation of such certificate, permit, registration, or license, found by the Commission to have been violated by such holder.

Proceedings for the imposition of any penalty provided for in this section may be commenced upon the complaint of any person or upon the Commission’s own initiative.

From any order of the Commission suspending, revoking, altering or amending any certificate, permit, registration, or license, the holder thereof shall have the right of appeal to the Supreme Court of Virginia, as a matter of right, as in other cases of appeals from the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-167; 1970, c. 708; 2017, c. 793.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793 inserted “registrations” and “registration” throughout the section.

§ 5.1-114.
Transfer or lease of certificate.

Any certificate issued under this chapter may be transferred or leased, subject to the approval of the Commission and under such reasonable rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Commission. An application for such approval shall be made jointly by the transferor and transferee, or lessor and lessee.

No certificate shall be transferred, leased or otherwise disposed of when any consideration is paid or promised which exceeds the then value of the tangible property sold in connection with the transfer or lease of such certificate.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-168; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-115.
No value allowed for certificates.

No value shall be allowed for any purpose for any certificate issued under this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-169; 1970, c. 708.